District of Columbia statutes.
47-1028

Daughters of American Revolution — Lots 8, 9, and 10, square 173.

The property situated in square no. 173 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lots 8, 9, and 10, inclusive, occupied by the Daughters of the American Revolution, is hereby exempt hereafter (May 21, 1924) from all taxes, so long as the same is so occupied and used, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemptions of church and school property, and acts amendatory thereof.

History

May 21, 1924, 43 Stat. 135, ch. 163
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1028.
1973 Ed., § 47-821.